Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1121.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 36, chapter 4, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 36-420.06, to read: START_STATUTE36-420.06. Procedures involving ionizing radiation; lead aprons; radiation protection systems; real-time dosimeters; definition A. A hospital that performs cardiac catheterization procedures involving real-time x-ray imaging may not require that physicians, physician assistants, nurses or other health professionals wear lead aprons during these procedures if the procedure room is equipped with a radiation protection system and the radiation protection system is in use according to the manufacturer's instructions, except if the hospital's radiation safety officer or the radiation safety officer's designee determines according to the "as low as reasonably achievable" standard that staff exposures will approach occupational dose thresholds or elevated exposure, the hospital's radiation safety officer or the radiation safety officer's designee may require lead aprons, thyroid collars or other radiation personal protection equipment. B. If a health professional chooses to not wear a lead apron because the procedure room is equipped with a radiation protection system, the hospital shall require the health professional to wear a real-time dosimeter device to monitor radiation exposure in real time. C. This section does not prohibit a health professional from voluntarily choosing to wear a lead apron during a procedure involving real-time x-ray imaging even if the procedure room is equipped with a radiation protection system. D. For the purposes of this section, "radiation protection system" means a shielding system that is designed to protect against scatter or direct ionizing radiation exposure, that provides protection equal to or greater than the shielding effectiveness of a .25 millimeter lead-equivalent apron.END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 19, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.